Hawaii statutes.
§437-23 Term of license. (a)
Expiration. All licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall expire on June
30 of each even-numbered year unless sooner terminated, suspended, or revoked.
All applications for renewal of license shall be filed on or before June 30 of
each even-numbered year together with the applicable fees.

(b) Reapplication. If a licensee fails to
renew the licensee's license on or before June 30 of each even-numbered year
and desires to continue in the business or activity for which the license was
issued, the licensee shall file a new application for a license and shall pay
in addition to the license and filing fee a penalty of twenty-five per cent of
the original license fee; provided that the board may for good cause waive the collection
of all or a part of the penalty; and provided that nothing contained in this
section shall limit the power of the board to deny any application on the
grounds provided in this chapter.

(c) Renewal fees for manufacturers and
distributors shall be as follows until renewal fees are adopted by the director
under this subsection in accordance with chapter 91:

(1) Biennial renewal fee: $1,000; and

(2) Biennial compliance resolution fund fee: $500
for each dealer franchised by the manufacturer or distributor. [L 1963, c 199,
§1j; Supp, §160-171.1; HRS §437-23; am L 1969, c 263, §1(12); am L 1975, c 118,
§3(2); gen ch 1985; am L 2003, c 126, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next